Hawaii, session 2025, GM1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that surfing is of
significant cultural, social, and economic value to the people
of the State, as well as the many visitors who travel to the
State for surfing. In recognition of surfing as a part of the
State's history and its long-standing cultural roots in Hawaii,
surfing was sanctioned by the department of education and
approved by the board of education as a high school sport in
2016. However, only one of five local athletic leagues have
sponsored surfing. The lack of interscholastic surfing programs
limits opportunities for inspired students to pursue competitive
surfing.
The legislature further finds that surfing is a significant
economic driver for the State. Surfing has grown into an
important industry in the State, bringing in tourists from all
over the world. The State is also known for hosting prestigious
surf contests that attract numerous competitors and spectators
who are interested in viewing the sport in person. An economic
2025-3290 HB133 GDI HMSO
liiffliiiiiiiiiiiiiin

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
impact study on the 2010 Vans Triple Crown of Surfing, held on
the north shore' of Oahu, estimated that the event generated
$20,900,000 in spending. Devoting resources to surfing programs
in the State's schools will perpetuate the sport of surfing in
the State and continue to entice tourists across the globe to
visit the State to spectate or experience surfing firsthand.
The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the
department of education to support the establishment of surfing
as an interscholastic sport.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $685,870 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 to support the establishment of surfing as an
interscholastic sport.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of education for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3290 HB133 CDl HMSO

MHigillHIMI

H.B. NO. ga
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 30th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 133, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 133, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
153